Mississippi, session 2026, HB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-805, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-805.  (a)  Candidates for state, state district, and legislative district offices, and every political committee, which makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate for any such office or makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a statewide ballot measure, shall file all reports required under this article with the Office of the Secretary of State. (b)  Candidates for county or county district office, and every political committee which makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate for such office or makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a countywide ballot measure or a ballot measure affecting part of a county, excepting a municipal ballot measure, shall file all reports required by this section * * *in the office of the circuit clerk of the county in which the election occurs, or directly to the Office of the Secretary of State via facsimile, electronic mail, postal mail or hand delivery. * * *  The circuit clerk shall forward copies of all reports to the Office of the Secretary of State. (c)  Candidates for municipal office, and every political committee which makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a candidate for such office, or makes reportable contributions to or expenditures in support of or in opposition to a municipal ballot measure shall file all reports required by this article * * *in the office of the municipal clerk of the municipality in which the election occurs, or directly to the Office of the Secretary of State via facsimile, electronic mail, postal mail or hand delivery. * * *  The municipal clerk shall forward copies of all reports to the Office of the Secretary of State. (d)  The Secretary of State * * *, the circuit clerks and the municipal clerks shall make all reports received under this subsection available for public inspection and copying and shall preserve the reports for a period of five (5) years. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-815, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-815.  (a)  The Secretary of State shall prescribe and make available forms and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this article. (b)  The Secretary of State * * *, circuit clerks and municipal clerks shall, within forty-eight (48) hours after the time of the receipt * * *by the appropriate office of reports and statements filed with it, make them available for public inspection, and copying at the expense of the person requesting such copying, and keep such designations, reports and statements for a period of three (3) years from the date of receipt. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.